pl_PL.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aioeznrwcysptkmdłuljągbhęśćóżfńźvqxšşáâäçčéëíôöúüAIOEZNRWCYSPTKMDŁULJĄGBHĘŚĆÓŻFŃŹVQXŠŞÁÂÄÇČÉËÍÔÖÚÜ


PFX b Y 1
PFX b   0         nie       .

SFX a Y 16
SFX a   e         ych       [^i]e
SFX a   e         ymi       [^i]e
SFX a   e         ym        [^i]e
SFX a   e         ch        [^n]ie
SFX a   e         m         [^n]ie
SFX a   e         mi        [^n]ie
SFX a   ie        ach       [km]anie
SFX a   ie        om        [km]anie
SFX a   ie        ami       [km]anie
SFX a   ie        ów        [km]anie
SFX a   ie        y         [km]anie
SFX a   ie        ach       [^km]anie
SFX a   ie        om        [^km]anie
SFX a   ie        ami       [^km]anie
SFX a   ie        0         [^km]anie
SFX a   ie        y         [^km]anie

SFX c Y 1
SFX c   i         u         i
